California statutes. Education Code
(b) The resource specialist program shall be under the direction of a resource specialist who is a credentialed special education teacher, or who has a clinical services credential with a special class authorization, who has had three or more years of teaching experience, including both regular and special education teaching experience, as defined by rules and regulations of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and who has demonstrated the competencies for a resource specialist, as established by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(c) Caseloads for resource specialists shall be stated in the local policies developed pursuant to Section 56195.8 and in accordance with regulations established by the board. A resource specialist shall not have a caseload that exceeds 28 pupils.

(d) Resource specialists shall not simultaneously be assigned to serve as resource specialists and to teach regular classes.

(e) Resource specialists shall not enroll a pupil for a majority of a schoolday without approval by the pupil’s individualized education program team.

(f) At least 80 percent of the resource specialists within a local plan shall be provided with an instructional aide.

(g) Local educational agencies shall take all reasonable steps to distribute the workload associated with initial assessments across all resource specialists employed by the local educational agency in an equal manner, unless otherwise collectively bargained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 560, Sec. 1.   (AB 560)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56362.1.

For the purposes of Section 56362, “caseload” shall include, but not be limited to, all pupils for whom the resource specialist performs any of the services described in subdivision (a) of Section 56362.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 972, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

56362.5.

By July 1982, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall adopt rules and regulations for a resource specialist certificate of competence. The certificate shall provide all the following:

(a) Definition of the competencies required of a resource specialist.

(b) Provision for a system of direct application to the commission for a certificate of competence for each teacher who holds a valid special education credential, other than an emergency credential, and who satisfies any one of the following criteria:

(1) Provided instruction and services as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 80070.1 of Title 5 of the California Administrative Code as it read immediately prior to July 28, 1980, for two years prior to September 1, 1981.

(2) Provided instruction and services as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 80070.2 of Title 5 of the California Administrative Code as it read immediately prior to July 28, 1980, for two years prior to June 30, 1983.

(c) Provision for the issuance, for up to three years, of a preliminary nonrenewable certificate of competence for the resource specialist, and adoption of the standards for the issuance and continuing validity of such a certificate. 

(d) Establishment of a system for verification of competencies through both of
 the following:

(1) Commission on Teacher Credentialing approved institution of higher education resource specialist certificate program.

(2) Commission on Teacher Credentialing approved competency assessment panels for resource specialist certification.

(e) Cooperation with the department in implementing these provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who held a preliminary resource specialist certificate of competence on January 28, 1982, and who met the requirements for a clear resource specialist certificate of competence as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may be issued a clear resource specialist certificate of competence upon submission of a completed application, but without any additional fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

56362.7.

(a) The Legislature recognizes the need for specially trained professionals to assess and serve pupils of limited English proficiency. This is particularly true of pupils with exceptional needs or pupils with suspected disabilities.

(b) The commission shall develop a bilingual-crosscultural certificate of assessment competence for those professionals who may participate in assessments for placements in special education programs. The certificate shall be issued to holders of
 appropriate credentials, certificates, or authorizations who demonstrate, by written and oral examination, all of the following:

(1) That the person is competent in both the oral and written skills of a language other than English.

(2) That the person has both the knowledge and understanding of the cultural and historical heritage of the limited-English-proficient individuals to be served.

(3) That the person has the ability to perform the assessment functions the candidate is certified or authorized to perform in English and in a language other than English.

(4) That the person has knowledge of the use of instruments and other assessment techniques appropriate to evaluate limited-English-proficient individuals with exceptional needs and ability to
 develop appropriate data, instructional strategies, individualized education programs, and evaluations.

(c) Certificates of bilingual-crosscultural competence for special education professionals who implement individual education plans requiring bilingual services shall be granted by the commission pursuant to Section 44253.7.

(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that possession of any certificate established by this section be a state-mandated requirement for employment or continued employment. It is the intent that this is a matter for local educational agencies to determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 46.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

56363.

(a) As used in this part, the term “designated instruction and services” means “related services” as that term is defined in Section 1401(26) of Title 20 of the United States Code and Section 300.34 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The term “related services” means transportation, and such developmental, corrective, and other supportive services (including speech-language pathology and audiology services, interpreting services, psychological services, physical and occupational therapy, recreation, including therapeutic recreation, social work services, school nurse services designed to enable an individual with exceptional needs to receive a free appropriate public education as described in the individualized education program of the child, counseling services, including rehabilitation counseling, orientation, and
 mobility services, and medical services, except that such medical services shall be for diagnostic and evaluation purposes only) as may be required to assist an individual with exceptional needs to benefit from special education, and includes the early identification and assessment of disabling conditions in children.

(b) These services may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Language and speech development and remediation. The language and speech development and remediation services may be provided by a speech-language pathology assistant as defined in Section 2530.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) Audiological services.

(3) Orientation and mobility services.

(4) Instruction in the home or hospital.

(5) Adapted physical education.

(6) Physical and occupational therapy.

(7) Vision services.

(8) Specialized driver training instruction.

(9) Counseling and guidance services, including rehabilitation counseling.

(10) Psychological services other than assessment and development of the individualized education program.

(11) Parent counseling and training.

(12) Health and nursing services, including school nurse services designed to enable an
 individual with exceptional needs to receive a free appropriate public education as described in the individualized education program.

(13) Social worker services.

(14) Specially designed vocational education and career development.

(15) Recreation services.

(16) Specialized services for low-incidence disabilities, such as readers, transcribers, and vision and hearing services.

(17) Interpreting services.

(c) The terms “designated instruction and services” and “related services” do not include a medical device that is surgically implanted, including cochlear implants, the optimization of the functioning of a medical device,
 maintenance of that device, or the replacement of that device, pursuant to Section 300.34(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations. In accordance with Section 300.34(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, nothing in this subdivision shall do any of the following:

(1) Limit the right of an individual with exceptional needs with a surgically implanted device, including a cochlear implant, to receive related services or designated instruction and services that are determined by the individualized education program team to be necessary for the individual to receive a free appropriate public education.

(2) Limit the responsibility of a local educational agency to appropriately monitor and maintain medical devices that are needed to maintain the health and safety of the individual, including breathing, nutrition, or operation of other bodily functions, while the
 individual is transported to and from school or is at school.

(3) Prevent the routine checking of an external component of a surgically implanted device to make sure it is functioning properly, as required by Section 300.113(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

56363.1.

A local educational agency is not required to purchase medical equipment for an individual pupil. However, the local educational agency is responsible for providing other specialized equipment for use at school that is needed to implement the individualized education program. For purposes of this section, “medical equipment” does not include an assistive technology device, as defined in Section 1401(1) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56363.3.

The average caseload for language, speech, and hearing specialists in special education local plan areas shall not exceed 55 cases, unless the local plan specifies a higher average caseload and the reasons for the greater average caseload.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 56, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

56363.5.

Pursuant to Section 300.154(d)(2)(iv) and (v) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if an individual with exceptional needs is covered by public benefits or insurance, a public agency may use Medicaid, other public benefits, or insurance programs in which a pupil participates to provide or pay for the services required by this part, the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and Part 300 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) The public agency provides written notification to the pupil’s parents.

(b) The public agency obtains written parental consent
 before accessing the pupil’s or parents’ public benefits or insurance for the first time, and annually thereafter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 14.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

56364.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 56364.2, pupils with low incidence disabilities may receive all or a portion of their instruction in the regular classroom and may also be enrolled in special classes taught by appropriately credentialed teachers who serve these pupils at one or more schoolsites. The instruction shall be provided in a manner which is consistent with the guidelines adopted pursuant to Section 56136 and in accordance with the individualized education program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 896, Sec. 60.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

56364.2.

(a) Special classes that serve pupils with similar and more intensive educational needs shall be available. The special classes may enroll pupils only when the nature or severity of the disability of the individual with exceptional needs is such that education in the regular classes with the use of supplementary aids and services, including curriculum modification and behavioral support, cannot be achieved satisfactorily. These requirements also apply to separate schooling, or other removal of individuals with exceptional needs
 from the regular educational environment.

(b) In providing or arranging for the provision of activities, each public agency shall ensure that each individual with exceptional needs participates in those activities with nondisabled pupils to the maximum extent appropriate to the needs of the individual with exceptional needs, including nonacademic and extracurricular services and activities. Special classes shall meet standards adopted by the board.

(c) This section shall only apply to special education local plan areas that have had a revised local plan approved pursuant to Section 56836.03.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 56364.5 (as added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 854) by Stats. 1998, Ch. 691, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

56364.3.

(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Superintendent shall recommend a maximum adult-to-pupil staffing ratio for special classes authorized pursuant to Section 56364.2 for pupils 3 to 22 years of age, inclusive, and post the recommendation on the department’s internet website.

(b) In
 making the recommendation required pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Consult with all of the following individuals:

(i) Current credentialed education specialists teaching in a special class setting. A majority of the individuals consulted pursuant to this paragraph shall meet this requirement.

(ii) Administrators and chief business officials serving at schoolsites, school districts, county offices of education, and special education local plan areas.

(iii) Paraprofessionals serving in special class settings.

(iv) Parents of pupils with exceptional needs who are served in special class settings.

(B) The individuals consulted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall represent the state’s geographic diversity, including, but not limited to, rural, urban, and high-need regions.

(2) Consult with researchers and representatives with expertise in inclusive practices and advocates focused on equity and disability rights.

(3) Consider all of the following:

(A) The varying needs of pupils, including pupils with mild to moderate support needs and pupils with extensive support needs.

(B) The varying needs
 of pupils by age.

(C) The types of school settings, including preschools,
 elementary schools, secondary schools, and nonpublic schools.

(D) Existing practices among local educational agencies.

(E) Other states’ adult-to-pupil ratios for special classes.

(F) Other constraints, including, but not limited to, workforce and facility needs, and conditions in small and rural local educational agencies.

(G) The effects on the education of pupils with disabilities in the least restrictive environment, as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(H) Determining appropriate staffing ratios to enhance pupil outcomes
 in accordance with the principles of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and state law.

(I) The supports needed for general education and special education educators to succeed in implementing inclusive models.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Superintendent shall report their recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the state board on or before April 1, 2027, consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 560, Sec. 2.   (AB 560)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

56365.

(a) Services provided by nonpublic, nonsectarian schools, as defined pursuant to Section 56034, and nonpublic, nonsectarian agencies, as defined pursuant to Section 56035, shall be made available. These services shall be provided pursuant to Section 56366, and in accordance with Section 300.146 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, under contract with the local educational agency to provide the appropriate special educational facilities, special education, or designated instruction and services required by the individual with exceptional needs if no appropriate public education program is available.

(b) Pupils enrolled in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and agencies under
 this section shall be deemed to be enrolled in public schools for all purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 41600) of Part 24 of Division 3 and Section 42238.02. The local educational agency shall be eligible to receive allowances under Articles 3 (commencing with Section 56836.165) and 4 (commencing with Section 56836.20) of Chapter 7.2 for services that are provided to individuals with exceptional needs pursuant to the contract.

(c) If the state participates in the federal program of assistance for state-operated or state-supported programs for individuals with exceptional needs (Public Law 89-313, Sec. 6), pupils enrolled in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools shall be deemed to be enrolled in state-supported institutions for all purposes of that program and shall be eligible to receive allowances under Chapter 7.2 (commencing
 with Section 56836) for supplemental services provided to individuals with exceptional needs pursuant to a contract with a local educational agency. In order to participate in the federal program, the state shall find that participation will not result in any additional expenditures from the General Fund.

(d) The local educational agency shall pay to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school the full amount of the tuition or to the nonpublic, nonsectarian agency fees, as applicable, for individuals with exceptional needs that are enrolled in programs or receiving services provided by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency pursuant to the contract.

(e) Before contracting with a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency outside of this state, the local educational agency shall document
 its efforts to use public schools or to locate an appropriate nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency program, or both, within the state.

(f) If a local educational agency places a pupil with a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency outside of this state, the pupil’s individualized education program team shall submit a report to the Superintendent within 15 days of the placement decision. The report shall include information about the special education and related services provided by the out-of-state program placement and the costs of the special education and related services provided, and shall indicate the efforts of the local educational agency to locate an appropriate public school or nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, or a combination thereof, within the state. The Superintendent shall submit a report to the board on all
 placements made outside of this state.

(g) If a local educational agency decides to place a pupil with a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency outside of this state, that local educational agency shall indicate the anticipated date for the return of the pupil to a public or nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency placement, or a combination thereof, located in the state and shall document efforts during the previous placement year to return the pupil.

(h) In addition to meeting the requirements of Section 56366.1, a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that operates a program outside of this state shall be certified or licensed by that state to provide, respectively, special education and related services and designated instruction and related services to pupils under the federal
 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.).

(i) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that is located outside of this state is eligible for certification pursuant to Section 56366.1 only if a pupil is enrolled in a program operated by that school or agency pursuant to the recommendation of an individualized education program team in California, and if that pupil’s parents or guardians reside in California.

(j) In accordance with Section 300.147(b) and (c) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall disseminate copies of applicable standards to each nonpublic, nonsectarian school and nonpublic, nonsectarian agency to which a local educational agency has referred or placed an individual with exceptional needs and shall
 provide an opportunity for those
 nonpublic, nonsectarian schools and nonpublic, nonsectarian agencies to participate in the development and revision of state standards that apply to those entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 454, Sec. 2.   (AB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the role of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall be maintained and continued as an alternative special education service available to a local educational agency and parents.

(a) The master contract for nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency services shall be developed in accordance with the following provisions:

(1) The master contract shall specify the general administrative and financial agreements, including teacher-to-pupil ratios, between the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and the local educational agency to provide the special education and designated instruction and
 services, as well as transportation specified in each pupil’s individualized education program. The administrative provisions of the contract also shall include procedures for recordkeeping and documentation, and the maintenance of school records by the contracting local educational agency to ensure that appropriate high school graduation credit is received by each pupil. The contract may allow for partial or full-time attendance at the nonpublic, nonsectarian school.

(2) (A) The master contract shall include an individual services agreement for each pupil placed by a local educational agency that will be negotiated for the length of time for which nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency special education and designated instruction and services are specified in the pupil’s individualized education program.

(B) The master contract shall include a description
 of the process being utilized by the local educational agency to oversee and evaluate placements in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools, as required by federal law. This description shall include a method for evaluating whether each pupil is making appropriate educational progress. At least once every year, the local educational agency shall do all of the following and, to the extent possible, the following shall be conducted as part of the development and provision of an individualized education program:

(i) Evaluate the educational progress of each pupil placed in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school, including all state assessment results pursuant to the requirements of Section 52052.

(ii) Consider whether or not the needs of the pupil continue to be best met at the nonpublic, nonsectarian school and whether changes to the individualized education program of the pupil are necessary,
 including whether the pupil may be transitioned to a public school setting. This consideration shall be made at the meeting required by subdivision (d) of Section 56343.

(C) In the case of a nonpublic, nonsectarian school that is owned, operated by, or associated with a licensed children’s institution, the master contract shall include a method for evaluating whether the nonpublic, nonsectarian school is in compliance with the mandate set forth in Section 56366.9 of this code and subdivision (b) of Section 1501.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) (A) Changes in educational instruction, services, or placement provided under contract may only be made on the basis of revisions to a pupil’s individualized education program.

(B) At any time during the term of the contract or individual services
 agreement, the parent, the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency, or the local educational agency may request a review of a pupil’s individualized education program by the individualized education program team. Changes in the administrative or financial agreements of the master contract that do not alter the individual services agreement that outlines each pupil’s educational instruction, services, or placement may be made at any time during the term of the contract as mutually agreed by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and the local educational agency.

(4) The master contract or individual services agreement may be terminated for cause. The cause shall not be the availability of a public class initiated during the period of the contract unless the parent agrees to the transfer of the pupil to a public school program. To terminate the contract either party shall give 20 days’ notice.

(5) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall provide all services specified in an individualized education program, unless the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and the local educational agency agree otherwise in the contract or individual services agreement.

(6) Related services provided pursuant to a nonpublic, nonsectarian agency master contract shall only be provided during the period of a pupil’s regular or extended school year program, or both, unless otherwise specified by the pupil’s individualized education program.

(7) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall report attendance of pupils receiving special education and designated instruction and services, as defined by Section 46307, for purposes of submitting a warrant for tuition to each contracting local educational agency.

(8) (A) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school is subject to the alternative accountability system developed pursuant to Section 52052 in the same manner as public schools and each pupil placed in the nonpublic, nonsectarian school by a local educational agency shall be tested by qualified staff of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school in accordance with that accountability program. The test results shall be reported by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school to the department.

(B) Beginning with the 2006–07 school year testing cycle, each nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall determine its California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress period subject to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 60640. The nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall determine this period based on completion of 85 percent of the instructional year at that nonpublic, nonsectarian school, plus and
 minus 10 days, resulting in a 21-day period. Each nonpublic, nonsectarian school shall notify the district of residence of a pupil enrolled in the school of its testing period. Staff at the nonpublic, nonsectarian school who administer the assessments shall attend the regular testing training sessions provided by the district of residence. If staff from a nonpublic, nonsectarian school have received training from one local educational agency, that training shall be sufficient for all local educational agencies that send pupils to the nonpublic, nonsectarian school. The district of residence shall order testing materials for its pupils that have been placed in the nonpublic, nonsectarian school. The board shall adopt regulations to facilitate the distribution of and collection of testing materials.

(9) With respect to a nonpublic, nonsectarian school, the school shall prepare a school accountability report card in accordance with Section
 33126.

(b) (1) The master contract or individual services agreement shall not include special education transportation provided through the use of services or equipment owned, leased, or contracted by a local educational agency for pupils enrolled in the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency unless provided directly or subcontracted by that nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency.

(2) The Superintendent shall withhold 20 percent of the amount apportioned to a local educational agency for costs related to the provision of nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency placements if the Superintendent finds that the local educational agency is in noncompliance with this subdivision. This amount shall be withheld from the apportionments in the fiscal year following the Superintendent’s finding of noncompliance. The Superintendent shall take other appropriate
 actions to prevent noncompliant practices from occurring and report to the Legislature on those actions.

(c) (1) If a pupil is enrolled in a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency with the approval of the local educational agency prior to agreement to a contract or individual services agreement, the local educational agency shall issue a warrant, upon submission of an attendance report and claim, for an amount equal to the number of creditable days of attendance at the per diem tuition rate agreed upon prior to the enrollment of the pupil. This provision shall be allowed for 90 days during which time the contract shall be consummated.

(2) If after 60 days the master contract or individual services agreement has not been finalized as prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), either party may appeal to the county superintendent of schools, if the county
 superintendent of schools is not participating in the local plan involved in the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency contract, or the Superintendent, if the county superintendent of schools is participating in the local plan involved in the contract, to negotiate the contract. Within 30 days of receipt of this appeal, the county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent, or his or her designee, shall mediate the formulation of a contract, which shall be binding upon both parties.

(d) A master contract for special education and related services provided by a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency may not be authorized under this part, unless the school or agency has been certified as meeting those standards relating to the required special education and specified related services and facilities for individuals with exceptional needs. The certification shall result in the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency receiving approval to
 educate pupils under this part for a period no longer than 18 months from the date of the initial approval.

(e) By September 30, 1998, the procedures, methods, and regulations for the purposes of contracting for nonpublic, nonsectarian school and agency services pursuant to this section and for reimbursement pursuant to Sections 56836.165 and 56836.20 shall be developed by the Superintendent in consultation with statewide organizations representing providers of special education and designated instruction and services. The regulations shall be established by rules and regulations issued by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 386, Sec. 26.   (SB 436)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

56366.1.

(a) A nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that seeks certification shall file an application with the Superintendent on forms provided by the department, and shall include all of the following information on the application:

(1) A description of the special education and designated instruction and services provided to individuals with exceptional needs if the application is for nonpublic, nonsectarian school certification.

(2) A description of the designated instruction and services provided to individuals with exceptional needs if the application is for nonpublic, nonsectarian agency certification.

(3) A list of appropriately qualified staff, a description of the credential, license, or registration that qualifies each staff member rendering special education or designated instruction and services to do so, and copies of their credentials, licenses, or certificates of registration with the appropriate state or national organization that has established standards for the service rendered.

(4) (A) (i) Commencing with the 2020–21 school year, documentation that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency will train staff who will have contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday in the use of evidence-based practices and interventions specific to the unique behavioral needs of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school’s or agency’s pupil
 population.
 The training shall be provided within 30 days of employment to new staff who have any contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday, and annually to all staff who have any contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday.

(ii) For a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency that was in existence as of the January 1 immediately preceding a school year, documentation that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school’s or agency’s staff members who will have contact or interaction with pupils during the schoolday have received training that complies with the requirements of subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(B) The training described in this paragraph shall be selected and conducted by the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency and shall satisfy all of the following
 conditions:

(i) Be conducted by persons licensed or certified in fields related to the evidence-based practices and interventions being taught.

(ii) Be taught in a manner consistent with the development and implementation of individualized education programs.

(iii) Be consistent with the requirements of Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 49005) of Chapter 6 of Part 27, relating to pupil discipline.

(C) The content of the training described in this paragraph shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Positive behavioral intervention and supports, including collection, analysis, and
 use of data to inform, plan, and implement behavioral supports.

(ii) How to understand and address challenging behaviors, including evidence-based strategies for preventing those behaviors.

(iii) Evidence-based interventions for reducing and replacing
 challenging behaviors, including de-escalation techniques.

(D) (i) The contracting local educational agency shall verify the nonpublic, nonsectarian school’s or agency’s compliance with the requirements of this paragraph, and the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall report the contracting local educational agency’s verification to the Superintendent annually with the annual certification documents described in subdivision (h).

(ii) For a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency seeking initial certification, the contracting local educational agency shall verify
 that the plan and timeline for training provided pursuant to this paragraph are included in the master contract.

(iii) For a nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency not in existence as of the January 1 immediately preceding a school year, the contracting local educational agency shall, 30 days following the commencement of the school year, verify that the nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency provided the training required by this paragraph, and shall submit the verification to the Superintendent at that time.

(iv) The nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency shall maintain written records of the training provided pursuant to this paragraph, and shall provide written verification of the training upon request.

(5) Commencing with the 2021–22 school year, documentation that the administrator of the nonpublic, nonsectarian school holds or is in the process of obtaining one of the following:

(A) An administrative credential granted by an accredited postsecondary educational institution and two years of experience with pupils with disabilities.

(B) A pupil personnel services credential that authorizes school counseling or psychology.

(C) A license as a clinical social worker issued by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(D) A license in psychology regulated by the Board of Psychology.

(E) A
 master’s degree issued by an accredited postsecondary institution in education, special education, psychology, counseling, behavioral analysis, social work, behavioral science, or rehabilitation.

(F) A credential authorizing special education instruction and at least two years of experience teaching in special education before becoming an administrator.

(G) A license as a marriage and family therapist certified by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(H) A license as an educational psychologist issued by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(I) A license as a professional clinical counselor issued by the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(6) An annual operating budget.

(7) Affidavits and assurances necessary to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations that include criminal record summaries required of all nonpublic, nonsectarian school or agency personnel having contact with minor children under Section 44237.

(8) Assurances of compliance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 49000) and Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 49005) of Chapter 6 of Part 27, and Section 56521.1, relating to behavioral interventions.

(9) Commencing with the 2024–25 school year, a nonpublic nonsectarian school shall include assurances that for any pupil
 served by the school who is a foster child as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 48853.5, the school agrees to do both of the following:

(A) Serve as the school of origin of the foster child, as applicable pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 48853.5.

(B) Allow the foster child to continue their education in the school, as applicable pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 48853.5.

(b) (1) The applicant shall provide the special education local plan area in which the applicant is located with the written notification of its intent to seek certification or renewal of its certification. The local educational agency representatives shall acknowledge that they have been
 notified of the intent to certify or renew certification. The acknowledgment shall include a statement that representatives of the local educational agency for the area in which the applicant is located have had the opportunity to review the application at least 60 calendar days before submission of an initial application to the Superintendent, or at least 30 calendar days before submission of a renewal application to the Superintendent. The acknowledgment shall provide assurances that local educational agency representatives have had the opportunity to provide input on all required components of the application.

(2) If the local educational agency has not acknowledged an applicant’s intent to be certified 60 calendar days from the date of submission for initial applications or 30 calendar days from the date of the return
 receipt for renewal applications, the applicant may file the application with the Superintendent.
